Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.67.010

Parks, beaches and camps.

In addition to exercising all powers relating to the acquisition of land, the improvement and operation thereof, or cooperation with other taxing districts in connection with park or recreation facilities, any code city may exercise the powers relating to acquisition and operation of recreational facilities, establishment and operation of public camps, and contracting with other taxing or governmental agencies for the acquisition or operation of public parks, camps and recreational facilities as authorized by chapter 67.20 RCW, in accordance with the procedures prescribed in and authorized by *RCW 79.08.080 and 79.08.090 in the application for use of state-owned tide or shorelands for a municipal park or playground purposes.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.67.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 79.08.080 and 79.08.090 were recodified as RCW 79.94.175 and 79.94.181 pursuant to 2003 c 334 s 570. RCW 79.94.175 and 79.94.181 were subsequently recodified as RCW 79.125.710 and 79.125.720 pursuant to 2005 c 155 s 1008.

Acquisition of interests in land for conservation, protection, preservation, or open space purposes by cities: RCW 64.04.130.